zh-TW: 濾波器斜率: 12 dB/倍頻程; 18 dB/倍頻程; 24 dB/倍頻程; 36 dB/倍頻程; 48 dB/倍頻程; 6 dB/倍頻程; 其他
sl-SI: Naklon filtra: 12 dB/oktava; 18 dB/oktava; 24 dB/oktava; 36 dB/oktava; 48 dB/oktava; 6 dB/oktava; Drugo
pt-BR: Inclinação do filtro: 12 dB/oitava; 18 dB/oitava; 24 dB/oitava; 36 dB/oitava; 48 dB/oitava; 6 dB/oitava; Outro
el: Κλίση φίλτρου: 12 dB/οκτάβα; 18 dB/οκτάβα; 24 dB/οκτάβα; 36 dB/οκτάβα; 48 dB/οκτάβα; 6 dB/οκτάβα; Άλλο
en: Filter slope: 12 dB/octave; 18 dB/octave; 24 dB/octave; 36 dB/octave; 48 dB/octave; 6 dB/octave; Other
nb: Filter helning: 12 dB/oktav; 18 dB/oktav; 24 dB/oktav; 36 dB/oktav; 48 dB/oktav; 6 dB/oktav; Annet
ro-RO: Pantă filtru: 12 dB/octavă; 18 dB/octavă; 24 dB/octavă; 36 dB/octavă; 48 dB/octavă; 6 dB/octavă; Altele
cs: Strmost filtru: 12 dB/oktávu; 18 dB/oktávu; 24 dB/oktávu; 36 dB/oktávu; 48 dB/oktávu; 6 dB/oktávu; Jiné
ru: Крутизна фильтра: 12 дБ/октава; 18 дБ/октава; 24 дБ/октава; 36 дБ/октава; 48 дБ/октава; 6 дБ/октава; Другой
pt-PT: Inclinação do filtro: 12 dB/oitava; 18 dB/oitava; 24 dB/oitava; 36 dB/oitava; 48 dB/oitava; 6 dB/oitava; Outro
tr: Filtre eğimi: 12 dB/oktav; 18 dB/oktav; 24 dB/oktav; 36 dB/oktav; 48 dB/oktav; 6 dB/oktav; Diğer
ko: 필터 기울기: 12 dB/옥타브; 18 dB/옥타브; 24 dB/옥타브; 36 dB/옥타브; 48 dB/옥타브; 6 dB/옥타브; 기타
da: Filterhældning: 12 dB/oktav; 18 dB/oktav; 24 dB/oktav; 36 dB/oktav; 48 dB/oktav; 6 dB/oktav; Andet
ja: フィルタースロープ: 12 dB/オクターブ; 18 dB/オクターブ; 24 dB/オクターブ; 36 dB/オクターブ; 48 dB/オクターブ; 6 dB/オクターブ; その他
vi: Độ dốc bộ lọc: 12 dB/octave; 18 dB/octave; 24 dB/octave; 36 dB/octave; 48 dB/octave; 6 dB/octave; Khác
lt-LT: Filtro nuolydis: 12 dB/oktava; 18 dB/oktava; 24 dB/oktava; 36 dB/oktava; 48 dB/oktava; 6 dB/oktava; Kita
de: Filterflankensteilheit: 12 dB/Oktave; 18 dB/Oktave; 24 dB/Oktave; 36 dB/Oktave; 48 dB/Oktave; 6 dB/Oktave; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Nagib filtra: 12 dB/oktava; 18 dB/oktava; 24 dB/oktava; 36 dB/oktava; 48 dB/oktava; 6 dB/oktava; Ostalo
th: ความชันของตัวกรอง: 12 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; 18 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; 24 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; 36 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; 48 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; 6 dB/อ็อกเทฟ; อื่นๆ
nl: Filter helling: 12 dB/octaaf; 18 dB/octaaf; 24 dB/octaaf; 36 dB/octaaf; 48 dB/octaaf; 6 dB/octaaf; Andere
fr: Pente du filtre: 12 dB/octave; 18 dB/octave; 24 dB/octave; 36 dB/octave; 48 dB/octave; 6 dB/octave; Autre
it: Pendenza del filtro: 12 dB/ottava; 18 dB/ottava; 24 dB/ottava; 36 dB/ottava; 48 dB/ottava; 6 dB/ottava; Altro
bg-BG: Стръмност на филтъра: 12 dB/октава; 18 dB/октава; 24 dB/октава; 36 dB/октава; 48 dB/октава; 6 dB/октава; Други
pl: Nachylenie filtra: 12 dB/oktawę; 18 dB/oktawę; 24 dB/oktawę; 36 dB/oktawę; 48 dB/oktawę; 6 dB/oktawę; Inne
zh-CN: 滤波器斜率: 12 dB/倍频程; 18 dB/倍频程; 24 dB/倍频程; 36 dB/倍频程; 48 dB/倍频程; 6 dB/倍频程; 其他
hu: Szűrőmeredekség: 12 dB/oktáv; 18 dB/oktáv; 24 dB/oktáv; 36 dB/oktáv; 48 dB/oktáv; 6 dB/oktáv; Egyéb
sv: Filterlutning: 12 dB/oktav; 18 dB/oktav; 24 dB/oktav; 36 dB/oktav; 48 dB/oktav; 6 dB/oktav; Övrigt
es: Pendiente del filtro: 12 dB/octava; 18 dB/octava; 24 dB/octava; 36 dB/octava; 48 dB/octava; 6 dB/octava; Otros
sk-SK: Sklon filtra: 12 dB/oktáva; 18 dB/oktáva; 24 dB/oktáva; 36 dB/oktáva; 48 dB/oktáva; 6 dB/oktáva; Iné
fi: Suodattimen kaltevuus: 12 dB/oktaavi; 18 dB/oktaavi; 24 dB/oktaavi; 36 dB/oktaavi; 48 dB/oktaavi; 6 dB/oktaavi; Muu